Louisiana, session 2026, HB1097.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:477(19) and 621.19 are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§477. Judicial districts
There shall be forty-one judicial districts in the state and each district shall
be composed as follows:
* * *
(19) The parish of East Baton Rouge shall compose the Nineteenth District.
The Nineteenth District shall consist of two three election sections. Election section
one shall consist of Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-7, 1-9, 1-10, 1-11, 1-13,
1-14, 1-15, 1-16, 1-17, 1-18, 1-19, 1-20, 1-21, 1-22, 1-23, 1-24, 1-25, 1-26, 1-27,
1-28, 1-29, 1-30, 1-31, 1-32, 1-36, 1-37, 1-38, 1-44, 1-45, 1-46, 1-50, 1-51, 1-52,
1-53, 1-54, 1-55, 1-58, 1-60, 1-61, 1-62, 1-63, 1-67, 1-68, 1-70, 1-71, 1-72, 1-76,
1-77, 1-78, 1-81, 1-82, 1-83, 1-84, 1-85, 1-86, 1-87, 1-88, 1-91, 1-92, 1-93, 1-94,
1-95, 1-96, 1-97, 1-100, 1-101, 1-102, 1-104, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-9, 2-10, 2-11,
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1301 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1097
2-12, 2-13, 2-14, 2-15, 2-16, 2-17, 2-18, 2-19, 2-20, 2-21, 2-22, 2-23, 2-24, 2-25,
2-26, 2-27, 2-28, 2-29, 2-30, 2-31, 2-32, 2-34, 2-35, 2-36, 2-37, 2-38, 3-8, 3-11, 3-24,
3-27, 3-28, 3-32, 3-42, 3-54, and 3-72 1-1, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-7, 1-8, 1-10, 1-11
(Part) Tract 003400 - Blocks 2006, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019,
2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032,
2033, 2034, 3000, 3001, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 4000, 4001,
4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, and 4011; 1-13, 1-14, 1-15,
1-16, 1-18, 1-19, 1-21, 1-22, 1-23, 1-24, 1-25, 1-26, 1-27, 1-28, 1-29, 1-30, 1-31,
1-32, 1-37, 1-38, 1-40, 1-44, 1-45, 1-46, 1-50, 1-51, 1-58, 1-61, 1-62, 1-63, 1-67,
1-76 (Part) Tract 002802 - Blocks 1011, 1012, and 1013; Tract 004013 - Blocks
3000 and 3005; Tract 004023 - Blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, and 3005;
Tract 004800 - Blocks 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, and 1013; 1-77, 1-84, 1-85,
1-86, 1-91 (Part) Tract 003104 - Blocks 1000, 1001, 6000, 6001, 6005, 6006, 6007,
6008, 6009, 6010, 6011, 6012, 6013, 6014, 6016, 6017, 6018, 6019, 7000, 7001,
7002, 7003, 7004, 7005, 7006, 7007, 7008, 7009, 7010, 7011, 7012, 7013, 7014,
7017, 7018, 7019, 7020, 7021, 7022, 7023, 7024, 7025, 7029, 7030, 7031, and 7037;
Tract 003201 - Blocks 3013; Tract 003300 - Blocks 1001; Tract 980000 - Blocks
1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013; 1-92, 1-93 (Part) Tract
003505 - Blocks 4008; 1-94, 1-95 (Part) Tract 003000 - Blocks 1000, 1001, 1002,
1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015,
1016, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014,
2016, 2017, 2018, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034,
2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, and 2042; 1-100, 1-101 (Part) Tract 003000 -
Blocks 2015, 2023, and 2024; Tract 003104 - Blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004,
2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001,
3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 7015, 7016, 7026, and 7027; Tract
004203 - Blocks 3022, 3031; 2-1 (Part) Tract 003505 - Blocks 2010, 2011, 3005, and
3006; 2-11 (Part) Tract 003201 - Blocks 3014 and 3015; Tract 003400 - Blocks
2036, 2037; 2-16, 2-23, and 2-30 of East Baton Rouge Parish. Election section two
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1301 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1097
shall consist of Precincts 1-8, 1-12, 1-33, 1-34, 1-35, 1-39, 1-40, 1-41, 1-42, 1-43,
1-47, 1-48, 1-49, 1-56, 1-57, 1-59, 1-64, 1-65, 1-66, 1-69, 1-73, 1-74, 1-75, 1-79,
1-80, 1-89, 1-90, 1-98, 1-99, 1-103, 1-105, 1-106, 1-107, 2-6, 2-7, 2-8, 2-33, 3-1, 3-2,
3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 3-7, 3-9, 3-10, 3-12, 3-13, 3-14, 3-15, 3-16, 3-17, 3-18, 3-19, 3-20,
3-21, 3-22, 3-23, 3-25, 3-26, 3-29, 3-30, 3-31, 3-33, 3-34, 3-35, 3-36, 3-37, 3-38,
3-39, 3-40, 3-41, 3-43, 3-44, 3-45, 3-46, 3-47, 3-48, 3-49, 3-50, 3-51, 3-52, 3-53,
3-55, 3-56, 3-57, 3-58, 3-59, 3-60, 3-61, 3-62, 3-63, 3-64, 3-65, 3-66, 3-67, 3-68,
3-69, 3-70, 3-71, 3-73, 3-74, 3-75, and 3-76 1-9, 1-11 (Part) Tract 003400 - Blocks
2007, 2008, 2010, 2011, and 2035; 1-20, 1-52, 1-53, 1-54, 1-55, 1-60, 1-70, 1-71,
1-72, 1-78, 1-81, 1-82, 1-83, 1-87, 1-88, 1-91 (Part) Tract 003104 - Blocks 7036;
Tract 004201 - Blocks 6009, 6010, 6011, and 6012; Tract 980000 - Blocks 1000,
1001, and 1002; 1-93 (Part) Tract 003505 - Blocks 4003, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4009,
4010, and 4011; 1-95 (Part) Tract 003000 - Blocks 2005, 2021, and 2022; 1-96, 1-97,
1-101 (Part) Tract 004203 - Blocks 3023 and 3024; 2-1 (Part) Tract 003505 - Blocks
1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002,
2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3007,
3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, and 4004; 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-6, 2-7, 2-8, 2-9,
2-10, 2-11 (Part) Tract 003201 - Blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006,
3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3016, and 3017; 2-12, 2-13, 2-14, 2-15, 2-17,
2-18, 2-19, 2-20, 2-21, 2-22, 2-24, 2-25, 2-26, 2-27, 2-28, 2-29, 2-31, 2-32, 2-33,
2-34, 2-35, 2-36, 2-37, 2-38, 3-1, 3-2, 3-6, 3-8, 3-9, 3-12, 3-14, 3-24, 3-25, 3-26,
3-28, 3-30, 3-32, 3-37, 3-42, 3-46, 3-54, 3-58, 3-61, and 3-72 of East Baton Rouge
Parish. Election section three shall consist of Precincts 1-2, 1-12, 1-33, 1-34, 1-35,
1-36, 1-39, 1-41, 1-42, 1-43, 1-47, 1-48, 1-49, 1-56, 1-57, 1-59, 1-64, 1-65, 1-66,
1-69, 1-73, 1-74, 1-75, 1-76 (Part) Tract 004013 - Blocks 1000 and 2000; Tract
004023 - Blocks 1000, 2000, 2001, 2002, and 3006; Tract 004800 - Blocks 1019,
1020, 1021, and 1022; 1-79, 1-80, 1-89, 1-90, 1-98, 1-99, 1-102, 1-103, 1-104,
1-105, 1-106, 1-107, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-7, 3-10, 3-11, 3-13, 3-15, 3-16, 3-17, 3-18, 3-19,
3-20, 3-21, 3-22, 3-23, 3-27, 3-29, 3-31, 3-33, 3-34, 3-35, 3-36, 3-38, 3-39, 3-40,
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1301 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1097
3-41, 3-43, 3-44, 3-45, 3-47, 3-48, 3-49, 3-50, 3-51, 3-52, 3-53, 3-55, 3-56, 3-57,
3-59, 3-60, 3-62, 3-63, 3-64, 3-65, 3-66, 3-67, 3-68, 3-69, 3-70, 3-71, 3-73, 3-74,
3-75, and 3-76 of East Baton Rouge Parish.
* * *
§621.19. Nineteenth Judicial District
The Nineteenth Judicial District Court shall have fifteen judges. Seven Five
judges shall be elected from election section one, seven five judges shall be elected
from election section two, and one judge shall be elected at large five judges shall
be elected from election section three. The judgeships designated as Divisions A B,
D, J, K, L, M, and O are assigned to election section one; the judgeships designated
as Divisions C, E, F, A, G, H, I, L, M, and N are assigned to election section two;
and the judgeship judgeships designated as Division B Divisions C, E, F, H, and I
shall be elected at large.
Section 2. (A) The precincts referenced in this Act are those contained in the file
named "2026 Precinct Shapefiles (01-27-2026)" available on the website of the Legislature
of Louisiana on the effective date of this Section. The 2026 Precinct Shapefiles are based
upon those Voting Districts (VTDs) contained in the 2020 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line
Shapefiles for the State of Louisiana as those files have been modified and validated through
the data verification program of the Louisiana House of Representatives and the Louisiana
Senate to represent precinct changes submitted through January 27, 2026, to the Legislature
of Louisiana by parish governing authorities pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 18:532 and
532.1.
(B) When a precinct referenced in this Act has been subdivided by action of the
parish governing authority on a nongeographic basis or subdivided by action of the parish
governing authority on a geographic basis in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
18:532.1, the enumeration in this Act of the general precinct designation shall include all
nongeographic and all geographic subdivisions thereof, however such subdivisions may be
designated.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1301 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1097
(C) The territorial limits of the districts as provided in this Act shall continue in
effect until changed by law regardless of any subsequent change made to the precincts by
the parish governing authority.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.